Utah statutes.
31A-8-217.   Material transactions by insurers which are part of holding company system.

(1) This section applies to an insurer licensed under this chapter that is part of a holding company system, for purposes of:

(a)  the reporting requirements of Section 31A-16-105; and

(b)  the material transaction standards of Section 31A-16-106.

(2)  Unless otherwise provided by rule, a transaction is not material under Subsection 31A-16-105(4) if the transaction involves an amount:

(a)  of not more than:

(i)  10% for each transaction; or

(ii)  20% for cumulative transactions during any one calendar year; and

(b)  calculated:

(i)  on the basis of the organization's surplus requirement, determined in accordance with Section 31A-5-211; and

(ii)  as of December 31 of the year immediately preceding the transaction.

